Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-8602
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Insured Homeowners Protection Act:

(1) Residential contractor means a person in the business of contracting or offering to contract with an owner or possessor of residential real estate to:

(a) Repair or replace a roof system or perform any other exterior repair, replacement, construction, or reconstruction work on residential real estate;

(b) Perform interior or exterior cleanup services on residential real estate;

(c) Arrange for, manage, or process the work referred to in subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of this section; or

(d) Serve as a representative, agent, or assignee of the owner or possessor of residential real estate;

(2) Residential real estate means a new or existing building, including a detached garage, constructed for habitation by at least one but no more than four families; and

(3) Roof system means and includes roof coverings, roof sheathing, roof weatherproofing, and insulation.

Laws 2012, LB943, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB743, § 31.